src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-piess_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹss: # Noun e-stem 'nest' - full paradigm
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Nom: piẹʹss
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Gen: piẹʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Acc: piẹʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Ill: peäsˈsa
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Loc: piẹʹzzest
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Com: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Ess: piẹʹssen
     pieʹss+N+Par: piẹʹssed
     pieʹss+N+Sg+Abe: [piẹʹzztaa, piẹʹzztää]
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Nom: piẹʹzz
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Gen: pieʹzzi
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Acc: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Ill: pieʹzzid
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Loc: pieʹzzin
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Com: pieʹzzivuiʹm
     pieʹss+N+Pl+Abe: [pieʹzzitaa, pieʹzzitää]
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: piẹʹzzteʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: piẹʹzzteeʹm
     pieʹss+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: piẹʹzzteʹmes
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Comp: piẹʹzztab
     pieʹss+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: piẹʹzztumus
